Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3257.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; WOLF-LIVESTOCK CONFLICT PREVENTION GRANTS.new text end new text begin $45,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $45,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of agriculture for wolf-livestock conflict prevention grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 3.737. The commissioner may use a portion of this appropriation to support nonlethal prevention work performed by federal wildlife services. new text end